Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [256K.55] BILL OF RIGHTS FOR PEOPLE UTILIZING SHELTER. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Homeless" or "homelessness" means lacking a fixed, regular, and adequate residence. new text end new text begin (c) "Homeless shelter" or "shelter" means any building, regardless of nature of ownership or operation or source of funding, intended for temporary indoor sleeping accommodations for persons who are homeless, including single adults, families, youth, or survivors of domestic violence or sexual assault. Homeless shelter or shelter does not include a shelter located on Tribal land or owned, operated, or administered by a Tribe. new text end new text begin (d) "People utilizing shelter" or "people" means persons utilizing a homeless shelter in Minnesota. new text end new text begin (e) "Service animal" has the meaning given in section 504B.113, paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (f) "Support animal" has the meaning given in section 504B.113, paragraph (c). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Right to be treated with dignity and respect. new text end new text begin (a) People utilizing shelter have the right to be treated with courtesy, dignity, and respect for their humanity, individuality, identity, and property by staff, volunteers, contractors, and agents of a shelter. People have the right to be treated equally and without discrimination because of their race, color, ethnicity, national origin, religion, creed, citizenship status, age, disability, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, employment status, source of income, personal appearance, status as a military veteran, marital status, familial status, medical history, need for a service animal or a support animal, limited English proficiency, or lack of a valid state driver's license, nondriver ID, or other form of government-issued identification. new text end new text begin (b) Nothing in this section prohibits denial of shelter to: new text end new text begin (1) a single adult by a shelter serving families only; new text end new text begin (2) a family by a shelter serving single adults only; new text end new text begin (3) an ineligible person by a shelter serving youths only; or new text end new text begin (4) an ineligible person by a shelter serving survivors of domestic violence only. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Right to adequate facilities. new text end new text begin People utilizing shelter have the right to be sheltered in facilities that are safe, clean, sanitary, and adequate to meet their temporary housing needs, including but not limited to sufficient and accessible restroom and shower facilities, sufficient space for wheelchairs and walkers, sufficient place for storage of personal items, and bedding and basic hygiene necessities. If a shelter serves food, people utilizing shelter have the right to food prepared in a safe and sanitary manner in accordance with all applicable health codes. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Right to reasonable accommodations. new text end new text begin (a) People with disabilities utilizing shelter have the right to reasonable accommodations and modifications of policies, practices, and procedures, including the rights and remedies granted under the Americans with Disabilities Act, the Fair Housing Act, section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act, and the Minnesota Human Rights Act. People have the right to have a service animal or a support animal in a shelter and space to accommodate them. new text end new text begin (b) People have the right to reasonable modification of rules and policies to accommodate work or child care hours and schedules, emergencies, obligations to care for relatives who do not reside in the shelter, and other extenuating circumstances that would result in the need to leave or return at times other than those articulated in the shelter rules to ensure no person utilizing shelter is unreasonably denied entry to the shelter facility. new text end new text begin (c) Shelters must take reasonable measures to: new text end new text begin (1) ensure that people with limited English proficiency understand the shelter rules and policies and can communicate with staff; and new text end new text begin (2) accommodate people with special dietary needs or religious restrictions. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Right to privacy. new text end new text begin People utilizing shelter have the right to personal privacy, at a minimum, when: new text end new text begin (1) changing clothes; new text end new text begin (2) using toilets, showers, and baths; and new text end new text begin (3) during medical examination or treatment. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Right to confidentiality of records. new text end new text begin People utilizing shelter have the right to have their personal, financial, health, and medical records kept private and secured. Except as otherwise required or allowed under law, a shelter may not release records of a person utilizing shelter without the person's consent. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Right to know about shelter rules and available resources. new text end new text begin Upon admission to a shelter, or as soon as practicable thereafter, every person utilizing shelter must be offered a notice in writing or provided in a method that is accessible to the person that include: new text end new text begin (1) the rules of the shelter, including any potential exclusions or exceptions, and a staff person to whom questions or concerns can be directed; new text end new text begin (2) a list of the rights enumerated in this section and, if requested, a full copy of this section; new text end new text begin (3) the shelter's procedures for requesting accommodations under subdivision 4; new text end new text begin (4) the shelter's grievance procedure, which also must be filed with the office of economic opportunity of the Department of Human Services; and new text end new text begin (5) a list of, and contact information for, public and private resources, including organizations providing: new text end new text begin (i) mental, physical, and chemical health care; new text end new text begin (ii) case management, housing, or employment services; and new text end new text begin (iii) assistance accessing public benefits. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Right to meet with attorneys, advocates, and others. new text end new text begin People utilizing shelter have the right to meet and communicate privately with attorneys, advocates, clergy, physicians, medical providers, social workers, and other professionals. The meetings must be allowed at reasonable hours, and immediately in an emergency, consistent with any physical limitations of the shelter facility. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Right to complain. new text end new text begin People utilizing shelter have the right to file grievances with the shelter provider or any relevant government entity regarding treatment of a person or the services provided by the shelter. A person may file a confidential grievance either verbally or in writing. Shelters must establish a confidential grievance procedure that includes identification of to whom a confidential complaint can be made. Shelters may not retaliate in any way against the person filing the grievance. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Ending shelter stay or services. new text end new text begin (a) A shelter manager or staff may end the stay of a person utilizing shelter if the shelter determines that the person poses a danger to shelter staff or other inhabitants based on a credible report that the person committed an act that would constitute criminal sexual conduct under sections 609.342 to 609.3451, inflicted or attempted to inflict bodily harm upon another, or used or threatened to use a dangerous weapon as defined in section 609.02, subdivision 6. In all other cases, ending a person's stay in shelter can occur only in the most severe circumstances. new text end new text begin (b) Shelters must exercise judgment before ending a person's stay in shelter. Before ending the person's stay, the shelter must: new text end new text begin (1) give the person the right to explain or refute the allegations that form the basis for ending the person's stay; new text end new text begin (2) examine all extenuating circumstances, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (i) the person's age and any known or apparent mental health conditions; and new text end new text begin (ii) whether ending the person's stay in shelter in dangerous weather conditions will jeopardize the life, health, or safety of the person; new text end new text begin (3) have the situation reviewed by a minimum of three shelter staff; and new text end new text begin (4) provide opportunity for mediation or conflict resolution. new text end new text begin (c) A person whose shelter stay has involuntarily been ended has the right to be provided with written documentation of the reason that the stay was ended; the date that the stay ends; and the procedure to file a grievance or, if applicable, appeal. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin No effect on other rights. new text end new text begin Nothing in this section shall be construed to eliminate, limit, or modify any rights of people utilizing shelter, including rights of notice or appeal, granted under any other provision of law. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, except subdivision 7, clause (5), is effective January 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin DIRECTION TO COMMISSIONER; BILL OF RIGHTS FOR PEOPLE UTILIZING SHELTER.new text end new text begin No later than January 1, 2026, the commissioner of human services, in consultation with relevant state and local agencies, including the Minnesota Interagency Council on Homelessness and nonprofit organizations serving or advocating for individuals and families who are experiencing homelessness, must develop a list of resources required to be distributed under Minnesota Statutes, section 256K.55, subdivision 7, clause (5). new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION; BILL OF RIGHTS FOR PEOPLE UTILIZING SHELTER.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services to develop the list of resources required to be distributed under Minnesota Statutes, section 256K.55, subdivision 7, clause (5). This is a onetime appropriation. new text end